Cellar/aspell/0.60.8/lib/aspell-0.60/uk_affix.dat
SFX i Y 43
SFX i ь ╕ ь 
SFX i 0 ╕ [^╕][вф] 
SFX i ь ю [^аоуеи╕яю╓╖].ь 
SFX i ь тю [аоуеи╕яю╓╖]ть 
SFX i ь ню [аоуеи╕яю╓╖]нь 
SFX i ь дю [аоуеи╕яю╓╖]дь 
SFX i ь лю [аоуеи╕яю╓╖]ль 
SFX i ь зю [аоуеи╕яю╓╖]зь 
SFX i ь сю [аоуеи╕яю╓╖]сь 
SFX i 0 'ю [^╕][вф] 
SFX i 0 ╕ [жчшщр] 
SFX i 0 'ю [ау]р 
SFX i 0 ю [^аоуеи╕яю╓╖][жчшщ] 
SFX i 0 чю [аоуеи╕яю╓╖]ч 
SFX i 0 жю [аоуеи╕яю╓╖]ж 
SFX i 0 шю [аоуеи╕яю╓╖]ш 
SFX i о а о 
SFX i о у о 
SFX i о ом о 
SFX i о ╕ [^кх]о 
SFX i хо с╕ хо 
SFX i ко ц╕ око 
SFX i е я [^жчшщ]е 
SFX i е ю [^жчшщ]е 
SFX i е ем [^жчшщ]е 
SFX i е ╕ [^жчшщ]е 
SFX i е а [жчшщ]е 
SFX i е у [жчшщ]е 
SFX i е ем [жчшщ]е 
SFX i е ╕ [жчшщ]е 
SFX i я ю я 
SFX i я ям я 
SFX i я ╕ [^'ь]я 
SFX i я ╖ ['ь]я 
SFX i ий ого ий 
SFX i ий ому ий 
SFX i ий им ий 
SFX i на но╖ на 
SFX i на н╕й на 
SFX i на ною на 
SFX i е ого [нк]е 
SFX i е ому [нк]е 
SFX i е им [нк]е 
SFX j Y 65
SFX j ь ей ь 
SFX j ь ям ь 
SFX j ь ями ь 
SFX j ь ях ь 
SFX j 0 ей [жчшщ] 
SFX j 0 ам [жчшщ] 
SFX j 0 ами [жчшщ] 
SFX j 0 ах [жчшщ] 
SFX j 0 ей [ау]р 
SFX j 0 ям [ау]р 
SFX j 0 ями [ау]р 
SFX j 0 ях [ау]р 
SFX j 0 ей ф 
SFX j 0 ям ф 
SFX j 0 ями ф 
SFX j 0 ях ф 
SFX j о а о 
SFX j ло ел сло 
SFX j о 0 [^с]ло 
SFX j ко ок [^ьоаеи╕у]ко 
SFX j о 0 [ьоаеи╕у]ко 
SFX j о 0 [^лк]о 
SFX j о ам о 
SFX j о ами о 
SFX j о ах о 
SFX j е ╕в [^жчшщц]е 
SFX j е ям [^жчшщ]е 
SFX j е ями [^жчшщ]е 
SFX j е ях [^жчшщ]е 
SFX j це дець серце 
SFX j це ець [^с]ерце 
SFX j е ь ╕сце 
SFX j йце ╓ць йце 
SFX j ьце ець ьце 
SFX j це ець [^йрсь]це 
SFX j е 0 [жшщ]е 
SFX j 0 й че 
SFX j е ам [жчшщ]е 
SFX j е ами [жчшщ]е 
SFX j е ах [жчшщ]е 
SFX j я ╖в 'я 
SFX j ня ь ння 
SFX j я ╕в [у]жжя 
SFX j жя 0 [^у]жжя 
SFX j тя ь ття 
SFX j я ь [^т]тя 
SFX j дя ь ддя 
SFX j я ь [^д]дя 
SFX j ля ь лля 
SFX j чя 0 ччя 
SFX j шя 0 шшя 
SFX j ся ь сся 
SFX j я ями я 
SFX j я ях я 
SFX j ий ╕ ий 
SFX j ий их ий 
SFX j ий ими ий 
SFX j ╕ их ╕ 
SFX j ╕ им ╕ 
SFX j ╕ ими ╕ 
SFX j н 0 ин 
SFX j ин 0 ин 
SFX j ин ам ин 
SFX j ин ами ин 
SFX j ин ах ин 
SFX k Y 8
SFX k ь е ь 
SFX k 0 е [чшж] 
SFX k 0 е [^╕]в 
SFX k ий а ий 
SFX k ий ╕й ий 
SFX k ий о╖ ий 
SFX k ий у ий 
SFX k ий ою ий 
SFX l Y 39
SFX l ╕нь ен╕ о[св]╕нь 
SFX l ь ню о[св]╕нь 
SFX l ╕ль ол╕ ╕ль 
SFX l ь лю ╕ль 
SFX l ╕ць оц╕ ╕ць 
SFX l ь цю ╕ць 
SFX l ╕ч еч╕ [^н]╕ч 
SFX l ╕ч оч╕ н╕ч 
SFX l ╕ш ош╕ ╕ш 
SFX l 0 чю ╕ч 
SFX l 0 шю ╕ш 
SFX l ╕сть ост╕ ╕сть 
SFX l ╖сть йост╕ ╖сть 
SFX l ь ╕ [^╖╕]сть 
SFX l ь ю сть 
SFX l 0 ти [^'][ая] 
SFX l 0 т╕ [^'][ая] 
SFX l 0 м [ая] 
SFX l 0 ти п'я 
SFX l 0 т╕ п'я 
SFX l 'я ен╕ [^п]'я 
SFX l 'я енем [^п]'я 
SFX l одець ╕дця одець 
SFX l одець ╕дцю одець 
SFX l одець ╕дцев╕ одець 
SFX l одець ╕дцем одець 
SFX l одець ╕дц╕ одець 
SFX l овець ╕вця овець 
SFX l овець ╕вцю овець 
SFX l овець ╕вцев╕ овець 
SFX l овець ╕вцем овець 
SFX l овець ╕вц╕ овець 
SFX l 0 у яр 
SFX l 0 ем яр 
SFX l 0 ев╕ яр 
SFX l 0 ю [аиу]р 
SFX l 0 ев╕ [аиу]р 
SFX l 0 ем [аиу]р 
SFX l 0 ╕ [аиу]р 
SFX m Y 66
SFX m ╕нь еней о[св]╕нь 
SFX m ╕нь еням о[св]╕нь 
SFX m ╕нь енями о[св]╕нь 
SFX m ╕нь енях о[св]╕нь 
SFX m ╕ль олей ╕ль 
SFX m ╕ль олям ╕ль 
SFX m ╕ль олями ╕ль 
SFX m ╕ль олях ╕ль 
SFX m ╕ч ечей [^н]╕ч 
SFX m ╕ч ечам [^н]╕ч 
SFX m ╕ч ечами [^н]╕ч 
SFX m ╕ч ечах [^н]╕ч 
SFX m ╕ч очей н╕ч 
SFX m ╕ч очам н╕ч 
SFX m ╕ч очами н╕ч 
SFX m ╕ч очах н╕ч 
SFX m ╕ш ошей ╕ш 
SFX m ╕ш ошам ╕ш 
SFX m ╕ш ошами ╕ш 
SFX m ╕ш ошах ╕ш 
SFX m ╕сть остей ╕сть 
SFX m ╕сть остям ╕сть 
SFX m ╕сть остями ╕сть 
SFX m ╕сть остях ╕сть 
SFX m ╖сть йостей ╖сть 
SFX m ╖сть йостям ╖сть 
SFX m ╖сть йостями ╖сть 
SFX m ╖сть йостях ╖сть 
SFX m ь ей [^╖╕]сть 
SFX m ь ям [^╖╕]сть 
SFX m ь ями [^╖╕]сть 
SFX m ь ях [^╖╕]сть 
SFX m 0 та [^'][яа] 
SFX m 0 т [^'][яа] 
SFX m 0 там [^'][яа] 
SFX m 0 тами [^'][яа] 
SFX m 0 тах [^'][яа] 
SFX m 0 та п'я 
SFX m 0 т п'я 
SFX m 0 там п'я 
SFX m 0 тами п'я 
SFX m 0 тах п'я 
SFX m 'я ена [^п]'я 
SFX m 'я ен [^п]'я 
SFX m 'я енам [^п]'я 
SFX m 'я енами [^п]'я 
SFX m 'я енах [^п]'я 
SFX m одець ╕дц╕ одець 
SFX m одець ╕дц╕в одець 
SFX m одець ╕дцям одець 
SFX m одець ╕дцями одець 
SFX m одець ╕дцях одець 
SFX m овець ╕вц╕ овець 
SFX m овець ╕вц╕в овець 
SFX m овець ╕вцям овець 
SFX m овець ╕вцями овець 
SFX m овець ╕вцях овець 
SFX m 0 ╕ яр 
SFX m 0 ╕в яр 
SFX m 0 ам яр 
SFX m 0 ами яр 
SFX m 0 ах яр 
SFX m 0 ╕в [аиу]р 
SFX m 0 ям [аиу]р 
SFX m 0 ями [аиу]р 
SFX m 0 ях [аиу]р 
SFX n Y 9
SFX n ╕нь ене о[св]╕нь 
SFX n ╕ль оле ╕ль 
SFX n ╕ч ече [^н]╕ч 
SFX n ╕ч оче н╕ч 
SFX n ╕ш оше ╕ш 
SFX n ╕сть осте ╕сть 
SFX n ╖сть йосте ╖сть 
SFX n ь те [^╖╕]сть 
SFX n 0 е [аиуя]р 
SFX q Y 2
SFX q 0 а яр 
SFX q 0 я [аиу]р 
SFX p Y 182
SFX p я йович ╕я 
SFX p я ╖вна ╕я 
SFX p я йовича ╕я 
SFX p я ╖вни ╕я 
SFX p я йовичу ╕я 
SFX p я йовичев╕ ╕я 
SFX p я ╖вн╕ ╕я 
SFX p я ╖вну ╕я 
SFX p я йовичем ╕я 
SFX p я ╖вною ╕я 
SFX p я йович╕ ╕я 
SFX p я ╖вно ╕я 
SFX p я йович╕в ╕я 
SFX p я йовичам ╕я 
SFX p я йовичами ╕я 
SFX p я йовичах ╕я 
SFX p я ╕ч [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕вна [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕ча [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕вни [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕чу [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕чев╕ [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕вн╕ [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕вну [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕чем [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕вною [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕ч╕ [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕вно [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕ч╕в [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕чам [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕чами [^╕]я 
SFX p я ╕чах [^╕]я 
SFX p а ич [^тс]а 
SFX p а ича [^тс]а 
SFX p а ичу [^тс]а 
SFX p а ичев╕ [^тс]а 
SFX p а ичем [^тс]а 
SFX p а ич╕ [^тс]а 
SFX p а ович [тс]а 
SFX p а овича [тс]а 
SFX p а овичу [тс]а 
SFX p а овичев╕ [тс]а 
SFX p а овичем [тс]а 
SFX p а ович╕ [тс]а 
SFX p а ╕вна а 
SFX p а ╕вни а 
SFX p а ╕вн╕ а 
SFX p а ╕вну а 
SFX p а ╕вною а 
SFX p а ╕вно а 
SFX p а ич╕в [^тс]а 
SFX p а ичам [^тс]а 
SFX p а ичами [^тс]а 
SFX p а ичах [^тс]а 
SFX p а ович╕в [тс]а 
SFX p а овичам [тс]а 
SFX p а овичами [тс]а 
SFX p а овичах [тс]а 
SFX p ╕р орович ╕р 
SFX p ╕р ор╕вна ╕р 
SFX p ╕р оровича ╕р 
SFX p ╕р ор╕вни ╕р 
SFX p ╕р оровичу ╕р 
SFX p ╕р оровичев╕ ╕р 
SFX p ╕р ор╕вн╕ ╕р 
SFX p ╕р ор╕вну ╕р 
SFX p ╕р оровичем ╕р 
SFX p ╕р ор╕вною ╕р 
SFX p ╕р орович╕ ╕р 
SFX p ╕р ор╕вно ╕р 
SFX p ╕р орович╕в ╕р 
SFX p ╕р оровичам ╕р 
SFX p ╕р оровичами ╕р 
SFX p ╕р оровичах ╕р 
SFX p ╕н онович и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н он╕вна и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н оновича и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н он╕вни и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н оновичу и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н оновичев╕ и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н он╕вн╕ и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н он╕вну и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н оновичем и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н он╕вною и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н онович╕ и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н он╕вно и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н онович╕в и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н оновичам и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н оновичами и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕н оновичах и[мх]╕н 
SFX p ╕в ович ╕в 
SFX p ╕в ╕вна ╕в 
SFX p ╕в овича ╕в 
SFX p ╕в ╕вни ╕в 
SFX p ╕в овичу ╕в 
SFX p ╕в овичев╕ ╕в 
SFX p ╕в ╕вн╕ ╕в 
SFX p ╕в ╕вну ╕в 
SFX p ╕в овичем ╕в 
SFX p ╕в ╕вною ╕в 
SFX p ╕в ович╕ ╕в 
SFX p ╕в ╕вно ╕в 
SFX p ╕в ович╕в ╕в 
SFX p ╕в овичам ╕в 
SFX p ╕в овичами ╕в 
SFX p ╕в овичах ╕в 
SFX p о ович о 
SFX p о ╕вна о 
SFX p о овича о 
SFX p о ╕вни о 
SFX p о овичу о 
SFX p о овичев╕ о 
SFX p о ╕вн╕ о 
SFX p о ╕вну о 
SFX p о овичем о 
SFX p о ╕вною о 
SFX p о ович╕ о 
SFX p о ╕вно о 
SFX p о ович╕в о 
SFX p о овичам о 
SFX p о овичами о 
SFX p о овичах о 
SFX p 0 ович [^врнуеао╕и╖╓яю] 
SFX p 0 ╕вна [^врнйуеао╕и╖╓яюь] 
SFX p 0 овича [^врнуеао╕и╖╓яю] 
SFX p 0 ╕вни [^врнйуеао╕и╖╓яюь] 
SFX p 0 овичу [^врнуеао╕и╖╓яю] 
SFX p 0 овичев╕ [^врнуеао╕и╖╓яю] 
SFX p 0 ╕вн╕ [^врнйуеао╕и╖╓яюь] 
SFX p 0 ╕вну [^врнйуеао╕и╖╓яюь] 
SFX p 0 овичем [^врнуеао╕и╖╓яю] 
SFX p 0 ╕вною [^врнйуеао╕и╖╓яюь] 
SFX p 0 ович╕ [^врнуеао╕и╖╓яю] 
SFX p 0 ╕вно [^врнйуеао╕и╖╓яюь] 
SFX p й ╖вна й 
SFX p й ╖вни й 
SFX p й ╖вн╕ й 
SFX p й ╖вну й 
SFX p й ╖вною й 
SFX p й ╖вно й 
SFX p 0 ович╕в [^врнуеао╕и╖╓яю] 
SFX p 0 овичам [^врнуеао╕и╖╓яю] 
SFX p 0 овичами [^врнуеао╕и╖╓яю] 
SFX p 0 овичах [^врнуеао╕и╖╓яю] 
SFX p ь ╕вна ь 
SFX p ь ╕вни ь 
SFX p ь ╕вн╕ ь 
SFX p ь ╕вну ь 
SFX p ь ╕вною ь 
SFX p ь ╕вно ь 
SFX p 0 ович [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 ╕вна [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 овича [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 ╕вни [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 овичу [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 овичев╕ [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 ╕вн╕ [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 ╕вну [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 овичем [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 ╕вною [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 ович╕ [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 ╕вно [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 ович╕в [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 овичам [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 овичами [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 овичах [^╕][врн] 
SFX p 0 ович [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 ╕вна [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 овича [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 ╕вни [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 овичу [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 овичев╕ [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 ╕вн╕ [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 ╕вну [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 овичем [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 ╕вною [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 ович╕ [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 ╕вно [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 ович╕в [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 овичам [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 овичами [^и]м╕н 
SFX p 0 овичах [^и]м╕н 
